Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.058

Transfer of service credit from statewide city employees' retirement system.

(1) Any person who was a member of the statewide city employees' retirement system governed by chapter 41.44 RCW and who also became a member of this retirement system on or before July 26, 1987, may, in a writing filed with the director, elect to:

(a) Transfer to this retirement system all service currently credited under chapter 41.44 RCW;

(b) Reestablish and transfer to this retirement system all service which was previously credited under chapter 41.44 RCW but which was canceled by discontinuance of service and withdrawal of accumulated contributions as provided in RCW 41.44.190. The service may be reestablished and transferred only upon payment by the member to the employees' savings fund of this retirement system of the amount withdrawn plus interest thereon from the date of withdrawal until the date of payment at a rate determined by the director. No additional payments are required for service credit described in this subsection if already established under this chapter; and

(c) Establish service credit for the initial period of employment not to exceed six months, prior to establishing membership under chapter 41.44 RCW, upon payment in full by the member of the total employer's contribution to the benefit account fund of this retirement system that would have been made under this chapter when the initial service was rendered. The payment shall be based on the first month's compensation earnable as a member of the statewide city employees' retirement system and as defined in *RCW 41.44.030(13). However, a person who has established service credit under **RCW 41.40.010(13) (c) or (d) shall not establish additional credit under this subsection nor may anyone who establishes credit under this subsection establish any additional credit under **RCW 41.40.010(13) (c) or (d). No additional payments are required for service credit described in this subsection if already established under this chapter.

(2)(a) In the case of a member of this retirement system who is employed by an employer on July 26, 1987, the written election required by subsection (1) of this section must be filed and the payments required by subsection (1)(b) and (c) of this section must be completed in full within one year after July 26, 1987.

(b) In the case of a former member of this retirement system who is not employed by an employer on July 26, 1987, the written election must be filed and the payments must be completed in full within one year after reemployment by an employer.

(c) In the case of a retiree receiving a retirement allowance from this retirement system on July 26, 1987, or any person having vested rights as described in RCW 41.40.150 (4), the written election may be filed and the payments may be completed at any time.

(3) Upon receipt of the written election and payments required by subsection (1) of this section from any retiree described in subsection (2) of this section, the department shall recompute the retiree's allowance in accordance with this section and shall pay any additional benefit resulting from such recomputation retroactively to the date of retirement from the system governed by this chapter.

(4) Any person who was a member of the statewide city employees' retirement system under chapter 41.44 RCW and also became a member of this retirement system, and did not make the election under subsection (1) of this section because he or she was not a member of this retirement system prior to July 27, 1987, or did not meet the time limitations of subsection (2) (a) or (b) of this section, may elect to do any of the following:

(a) Transfer to this retirement system all service currently credited under chapter 41.44 RCW;

(b) Reestablish and transfer to this retirement system all service that was previously credited under chapter 41.44 RCW but was canceled by discontinuance of service and withdrawal of accumulated contributions as provided in RCW 41.44.190; and

(c) Establish service credit for the initial period of employment not to exceed six months, prior to establishing membership under chapter 41.44 RCW.

To make the election or elections, the person must pay the amount required under RCW 41.50.165(2) prior to retirement from this retirement system.

[ 1994 c 197 s 25; 1987 c 417 s 1; 1984 c 184 s 9. Formerly RCW 41.40.403.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 41.44.030 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (13) to subsection (10).

**(2) RCW 41.40.010 was alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k), changing subsection (13) to subsection (23).

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1994 c 197: See notes following RCW 41.50.165.

Severability—1984 c 184: See note following RCW 41.50.150.